Hawaii statutes.
§438-15 Right of injunction. The
department may, in addition to any other remedies available, apply to a court
having competent jurisdiction for an injunction to restrain any violation of
this chapter. [L 1986, c 138, §6 and c 211, §3; am L 1993, c 264, §12]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next